Washington statutes.
RCW 43.01.075

Refund of fees or other payments collected by state—Limitation where amount is two dollars or less.

No such refund shall be authorized by a state agency where the amount is two dollars or less unless demand for the refund is made within six months from the date the erroneous or excessive payment was made.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.01.075. Prior: 1955 c 224 s 4.]